South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S383.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Citation SECTION 1.    This act may be cited as the "Prothonotary Warbler Recognition Act." Official state migratory bird SECTION 2.    Article 9, Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 1-1-613.    The Prothonotary Warbler (Protonotaria citrea) is the official state migratory bird of South Carolina. Time effective SECTION 3.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 25th day of February, 2026. Approved the 27th day of February, 2026. __________